Utah statutes.
45-1-305.   Supplementary publication by broadcast -- Definitions.

As used in this act:

(1)  The word "broadcast" means the transmission of information by means of radio or television facilities.

(2)  The word "notice" means any notice that is required by law to be published.

(3)  The word "station" means any radio or television station licensed for commercial operation by the Federal Communications Commission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 5, 2009 Special Session 1

